Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WORLD JUNIOR HOCKEY CHAMPIONSHIPS.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Minnesota Sports and Events for costs related to the World Junior Hockey Championships, which will occur in Minnesota in December 2025 and January 2026. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end